Illinois, session 104th, SB3391.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Charter 5School Closure Financial Accountability Law. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds and 7declares all of the following: 8        (1) Public funds and public property provided to 9    charter schools must be protected and used for students' 10    education. 11        (2) Charter schools in this State may close during a 12    school year, and when they do there is a risk that 13    students, employees, and public assets will suffer harm 14    while the charter operator faces no meaningful financial 15    accountability. 16        (3) Current law and administrative guidance address 17    closure procedures but do not uniformly require a 18    prefunded financial mechanism sufficient to cover 19    transition costs, severance, and the return of publicly 20    funded property. 21        (4) It is, therefore, necessary to require charter 22    operators to maintain closure reserves, require return of 23    public assets purchased with public funds, provide   SB3391 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 20151 LNS 33602 b1    remedies to recover costs incurred by authorizers and 2    students' home districts, and impose penalties for 3    mid-year abandonment that is negligent or in bad faith. 4    Section 10. The School Code is amended by changing 5Sections 27A-3 and 27A-9 and by adding Sections 27A-9.5, 627A-10.15, and 27A-10.20 as follows: 7    (105 ILCS 5/27A-3)8    Sec. 27A-3. Definitions. For purposes of this Article:9    "At-risk pupil" means a pupil who, because of physical, 10emotional, socioeconomic, or cultural factors, is less likely 11to succeed in a conventional educational environment.12    "Authorizer" means an entity authorized under this Article 13to review applications, decide whether to approve or reject 14applications, enter into charter contracts with applicants, 15oversee charter schools, and decide whether to renew, not 16renew, or revoke a charter.17    "Charter operator" means the entity that has entered into 18a charter agreement with an authorizer under this Article and 19is legally responsible for the operation of the charter 20school. 21    "Charter school" means a school established under this 22Article and operated under an agreement between an authorizer 23and a charter operator. 24    "Closure event" means any termination, revocation,   SB3391 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 20151 LNS 33602 b1nonrenewal, or voluntary cessation of operations of a charter 2school resulting in the charter school's permanent cessation 3of instruction to enrolled pupils that occurs during the 4school year.5    "Closure security" means a financial instrument listed 6under subsection (a) of Section 27A-10.15.7    "District signed-agreement requirements" means any 8standard provisions that are required in any agreement entered 9into by an authorizer. 10    "Financial distress" means one or more of the following 11conditions, as determined by an authorizer based on documented 12evidence:13        (1) failure to timely meet payroll, benefits, or other 14    operating obligations;15        (2) material audit findings indicating insolvency, 16    negative cash flow, or substantial doubt as to a charter 17    school's ability to continue as a going concern;18        (3) default or imminent default on debt or lease 19    obligations;20        (4) failure to maintain required closure security or 21    other financial reserves required under this Article;22        (5) evidence of misuse or misappropriation of public 23    funds; or24        (6) any financial condition that poses an imminent 25    risk to the continued operation of a charter school or to 26    the orderly transition of enrolled pupils.  SB3391 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 20151 LNS 33602 b1    "Financial intervention" means a temporary, limited 2assumption of financial oversight authority by an authorizer 3for the purpose of stabilizing a charter school and protecting 4students, employees, and public assets.5    "Good faith" means the duty to cooperate with an opposing 6party fairly in reaching an agreement. 7    "Local school board" means the duly elected or appointed 8school board or board of education of a public school 9district, including special charter districts and school 10districts located in cities having a population of more than 11500,000, organized under the laws of this State.12    "Public assets" means equipment, furniture, books, 13instructional technology, real estate, or any other real or 14personal property purchased or leased with public funds or 15purchased with funds subject to public oversight. 16    "State Board" means the State Board of Education.17    "Union neutrality clause" means a provision whereby a 18charter school agrees: (1) to be neutral regarding the 19unionization of any of its employees, such that the charter 20school will not at any time express a position on the matter of 21whether its employees will be unionized and such that the 22charter school will not threaten, intimidate, discriminate 23against, retaliate against, or take any adverse action against 24any employees based on their decision to support or oppose 25union representation; (2) to provide any bona fide labor 26organization access at reasonable times to areas in which the   SB3391 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 20151 LNS 33602 b1charter school's employees work for the purpose of meeting 2with employees to discuss their right to representation, 3employment rights under the law, and terms and conditions of 4employment; and (3) that union recognition shall be through a 5majority card check verified by a neutral third-party 6arbitrator mutually selected by the charter school and the 7bona fide labor organization through alternate striking from a 8panel of arbitrators provided by the Federal Mediation and 9Conciliation Service. As used in this definition, "bona fide 10labor organization" means a labor organization recognized 11under the National Labor Relations Act or the Illinois 12Educational Labor Relations Act. As used in this definition, 13"employees" means non-represented, non-management, and 14non-confidential employees of a charter school. 15(Source: P.A. 103-175, eff. 6-30-23; 103-416, eff. 8-4-23; 16103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 17    (105 ILCS 5/27A-9)18    Sec. 27A-9. Term of charter; renewal. 19    (a) An initial charter shall be granted for a period of 5 20school years. A charter may be renewed in incremental periods 21not to exceed 10 school years. Authorizers shall ensure that 22every charter granted on or after January 1, 2017 includes 23standards and goals for academic, organizational, and 24financial performance. A charter must meet all standards and 25goals for academic, organizational, and financial performance   SB3391 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 20151 LNS 33602 b1set forth by the authorizer in order to be renewed for a term 2in excess of 5 years but not more than 10 years. If an 3authorizer fails to establish standards and goals, a charter 4shall not be renewed for a term in excess of 5 years. Nothing 5contained in this Section shall require an authorizer to grant 6a full 10-year renewal term to any particular charter school, 7but an authorizer may award a full 10-year renewal term to 8charter schools that have a demonstrated track record of 9improving student performance. 10    (b) A charter school renewal proposal submitted to the 11local school board or the State Board, as the chartering 12entity, shall contain:13        (1) a report on the progress of the charter school in 14    achieving the goals, objectives, pupil performance 15    standards, content standards, and other terms of the 16    initial approved charter proposal; and17        (2) a financial statement that discloses the costs of 18    administration, instruction, and other spending categories 19    for the charter school that is understandable to the 20    general public and that will allow comparison of those 21    costs to other schools or other comparable organizations, 22    in a format required by the State Board.23    (c) A charter may be revoked or not renewed if the local 24school board or the State Board, as the chartering entity, 25clearly demonstrates that the charter school did any of the 26following, or otherwise failed to comply with the requirements   SB3391 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 20151 LNS 33602 b1of this law:2        (1) Committed a material violation of any of the 3    conditions, standards, or procedures set forth in the 4    charter.5        (2) Failed to meet or make reasonable progress toward 6    achievement of the content standards or pupil performance 7    standards identified in the charter.8        (3) Failed to meet generally accepted standards of 9    fiscal management.10        (4) Violated any provision of law from which the 11    charter school was not exempted.12        (5) Failed to execute a charter contract after good 13    faith negotiations in accordance with Section 27A-9.5. 14    In the case of revocation, the local school board or the 15State Board, as the chartering entity, shall notify the 16charter school in writing of the reason why the charter is 17subject to revocation. The charter school shall submit a 18written plan to the local school board or the State Board, 19whichever is applicable, to rectify the problem. The plan 20shall include a timeline for implementation, which shall not 21exceed 2 years or the date of the charter's expiration, 22whichever is earlier. If the local school board or the State 23Board, as the chartering entity, finds that the charter school 24has failed to implement the plan of remediation and adhere to 25the timeline, then the chartering entity shall revoke the 26charter. Except in situations of an emergency where the   SB3391 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 20151 LNS 33602 b1health, safety, or education of the charter school's students 2is at risk, the revocation shall take place at the end of a 3school year. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 4prohibit an implementation timetable that is less than 2 years 5in duration. No local school board may arbitrarily or 6capriciously revoke or not renew a charter. Except for 7extenuating circumstances outlined in this Section, if a local 8school board revokes or does not renew a charter, it must 9ensure that all students currently enrolled in the charter 10school are placed in schools that are higher performing than 11that charter school, as defined in the State's federal Every 12Student Succeeds Act accountability plan. In determining 13whether extenuating circumstances exist, a local school board 14must detail, by clear and convincing evidence, that factors 15unrelated to the charter school's accountability designation 16outweigh the charter school's academic performance. 17    (d) (Blank).18    (e) Notice of a local school board's decision to deny, 19revoke, or not renew a charter shall be provided to the State 20Board. 21    The State Board may reverse a local board's decision to 22revoke or not renew a charter if the State Board finds that the 23charter school or charter school proposal (i) is in compliance 24with this Article and (ii) is in the best interests of the 25students it is designed to serve. The State Board may 26condition the granting of an appeal on the acceptance by the   SB3391 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 20151 LNS 33602 b1charter school of funding in an amount less than that 2requested in the proposal submitted to the local school board. 3The State Board must appoint and utilize a hearing officer for 4any appeals conducted under this subsection. Final decisions 5of the State Board are subject to judicial review under the 6Administrative Review Law. 7    (f) Notwithstanding other provisions of this Article, if 8the State Board on appeal reverses a local board's decision or 9if a charter school is approved by referendum, the State Board 10shall act as the authorized chartering entity for the charter 11school and shall perform all functions under this Article 12otherwise performed by the local school board. The State Board 13shall report the aggregate number of charter school pupils 14resident in a school district to that district and shall 15notify the district of the amount of funding to be paid by the 16State Board to the charter school enrolling such students. The 17charter school shall maintain accurate records of daily 18attendance and student enrollment and shall enter data on the 19students served, their characteristics, their particular 20needs, the programs in which they participate, and their 21academic achievement into the statewide student information 22system established by the State Board. The State Board shall 23withhold from funds otherwise due the district the funds 24authorized by this Article to be paid to the charter school and 25shall pay such amounts to the charter school in quarterly 26installments, calculated as follows:  SB3391 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 20151 LNS 33602 b1        (1) The amount of the first quarterly payment shall be 2    based on the projected number of students who will be 3    enrolled in the charter school in the upcoming school 4    year, multiplied by one-fourth of the resident district's 5    per capita tuition amount. Each charter school shall 6    submit its projected enrollment by no later than August 1 7    of each year on a form provided by the State Board for this 8    purpose.9        (2) The amount of the second quarterly payment shall 10    be calculated such that the aggregate amount of the first 11    and second quarterly installments is equal to the number 12    of students reported as enrolled at the charter school on 13    October 1 in the State Board's student information system, 14    multiplied by one-half of the resident district's per 15    capita tuition amount.16        (3) The amount of the third quarterly payment shall be 17    based on the number of students enrolled in the charter 18    school on January 1, multiplied by one-fourth of the 19    resident district's per capita tuition amount. Each 20    charter school shall submit its January 1 enrollment by no 21    later than January 5 of each year on a form provided by the 22    State Board for this purpose. 23        (4) The amount of the fourth quarterly payment shall 24    be calculated such that the aggregate amount of the third 25    and fourth installments is equal to the number of students 26    reported as enrolled at the charter school on March 1 in   SB3391 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 20151 LNS 33602 b1    the State Board's student information system, multiplied 2    by one-half of the resident district's per capita tuition 3    amount. 4    (g) (Blank).5    (h) The State Board shall pay directly to a charter school 6it authorizes any federal or State funding attributable to a 7student with a disability attending the school. 8(Source: P.A. 103-175, eff. 6-30-23.) 9    (105 ILCS 5/27A-9.5 new)10    Sec. 27A-9.5. Charter renewal; timely execution; funding 11consequences.12    (a) This Section applies to all charter renewals approved 13on or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 14104th General Assembly.15    (b) For an initial agreement, no public funds may be 16disbursed to a charter operator unless and until a charter 17agreement has been fully executed by both the charter operator 18and the authorizer.19    After the initial agreement, the charter operator and the 20authorizer shall negotiate the terms of the charter renewal 21agreement within 90 days after the authorizer's passage of a 22renewal resolution consistent with applicable State law and 23district policy. In no circumstance may the charter operator 24operate under an expired agreement at the start of a school 25year that begins more than 90 days after the authorizer's   SB3391 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 20151 LNS 33602 b1passage of the renewal resolution. No public funds may be 2distributed after 90 days until an agreement is reached.3    A charter operator's refusal to execute or negotiate, in 4good faith, a charter renewal agreement that incorporates the 5requirements of State law or district signed-agreement 6requirements constitutes grounds for nonrenewal. 7    (105 ILCS 5/27A-10.15 new)8    Sec. 27A-10.15. Closure financial accountability.9    (a) Every charter operator shall maintain, while its 10charter is in effect, one or more of the following financial 11instruments to secure closure obligations:12        (1) an escrow account held in a financial institution 13    in this State in the name of the charter school, funded in 14    cash;15        (2) a surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit 16    issued by a financial institution authorized to do 17    business in this State; or18        (3) a segregated reserve fund reflected on the charter 19    school's audited financial statements and held in a manner 20    acceptable to the authorizer.21    A charter operator in operation on the effective date of 22this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly must comply 23with this Section within 2 fiscal years after the effective 24date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 25    (b) The closure security under subsection (a) for a   SB3391 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 20151 LNS 33602 b1charter school in operation for at least one fiscal year must 2equal 3 months of the charter school's average operating 3expenditures based on its last audited fiscal year. If the 4closure security is below the required amount, the authorizer 5may require a remediation plan to reach compliance within 2 6fiscal years. Failure to timely comply is grounds for 7suspension of enrollment growth and may be considered in a 8charter renewal determination.9    For a charter operator in operation for less than one 10fiscal year, the closure security must equal 3 months of the 11charter school's projected annual budget, as approved by the 12charter's authorizer. The closure security for such a charter 13operator must be established and funded to at least 50% of the 14required amount, based on the charter operator's projected 15budget, at the time the charter is granted or, for a charter 16granted before the effective date of this amendatory Act of 17the 104th General Assembly, within 30 days after the effective 18date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly and 19must reach the full required amount by the end of the charter's 20second full fiscal year.21    (c) Closure security shall be used, in priority order, to 22pay: 23        (1) the direct costs of transitioning students, such 24    as transportation, records transfer, and student placement 25    assistance, incurred by the authorizer or receiving school 26    district;  SB3391 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 20151 LNS 33602 b1        (2) any outstanding payroll for employees for time 2    worked through the closure date, including legally 3    required benefits, and severance if contractually required 4    under the charter operator's collective bargaining 5    agreements or employment contracts;6        (3) any costs reasonably incurred for the storage or 7    transfer of student records and special education 8    documents required to ensure continuity of services;9        (4) any costs to return public assets to the 10    authorizer or otherwise account for disposition of public 11    assets purchased with public funds;12        (5) any reasonable administrative costs incurred by 13    the authorizer or the State Board to supervise and execute 14    the closure and student transition; and15        (6) any costs related to emergency expenditures not 16    created by the negligence or mismanagement of the charter 17    operator and agreed to by the authorizer.18    Closure security may not be used to pay any preexisting, 19unrelated debt of the charter operator that is not connected 20to the operating obligations to students, employees, or public 21property, except as permitted under this subsection.22    Any remaining closure security funds after satisfaction of 23the obligations described in this subsection shall be returned 24to the authorizer and shall remain public funds in accordance 25with State and federal law. 26    (d) A charter operator must provide the authorizer and the   SB3391 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 20151 LNS 33602 b1State Board written notice of the charter operator's intent to 2close a charter school no fewer than 90 days before the planned 3closure and must provide immediate notice upon any involuntary 4closure action, insolvency event, or cessation of operations.5    Within 30 days after a closure event, the authorizer shall 6publish a closure action statement that lists amounts from the 7closure security disbursed and the uses.8    (e) Failure to maintain closure security as required under 9this Section is a basis for: 10        (1) the authorizer to withhold a portion of per-pupil 11    payments until compliance is achieved; and12        (2) consideration in denying a charter renewal or 13    revoking the charter or ineligibility to operate 14    additional charter campuses.15    For purposes of this Section, the State Board may act in 16its regulatory oversight capacity for all authorizers and in 17its capacity as an authorizer for charter schools it directly 18authorizes under this Article.19    If the closure security is insufficient to cover the costs 20of a closure event as set forth in subsection (c), the 21authorizer or the State Board may: 22        (1) bring a civil action against the charter operator 23    to recover the unpaid amounts; and24        (2) seek to impose a lien on any property owned by the 25    charter operator that is located in this State to secure 26    recovery.   SB3391 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 20151 LNS 33602 b1    In cases in which a closure results from gross negligence, 2willful misconduct, or intentional misappropriation of public 3funds by the charter operator or its officers or directors, 4the authorizer or State Board may seek recovery from 5individual officers, directors, or persons who knowingly 6caused the gross negligence, willful misconduct, or 7intentional misappropriation, including civil penalties not to 8exceed $50,000 per violation and reasonable attorney's fees.9    (f) Upon closure, any public assets purchased with public 10funds shall be returned to the authorizer or otherwise 11disposed of in accordance with applicable State and federal 12law governing property acquired with public funds. Proceeds 13from any sale of such assets shall be applied first to 14outstanding obligations to students and employees, and then to 15the reimbursement of public funds.16    (g) The State Board shall adopt rules to implement this 17Section within one year after the effective date of this 18amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, including 19acceptable forms of closure security, procedures for claims on 20closure security, and documentation standards for authorizers 21to approve closure security.  22    (105 ILCS 5/27A-10.20 new)23    Sec. 27A-10.20. Financial distress; charter school 24financial intervention.25    (a) If an authorizer determines that a charter school is   SB3391 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 20151 LNS 33602 b1in financial distress, the authorizer may require the charter 2operator to submit a financial remediation plan for approval 3within 30 days after that determination. The remediation plan 4shall include, at a minimum:5        (1) current cash-flow projections;6        (2) corrective actions to address identified 7    deficiencies;8        (3) a timeline for achieving fiscal stability; and9        (4) enhanced financial-reporting requirements as 10    specified by the authorizer.11    Failure to timely submit a remediation plan or implement 12an approved remediation plan constitutes grounds for financial 13intervention under subsection (b).14    (b) If the authorizer determines that (i) the charter 15school has failed to implement an approved remediation plan or 16(ii) the financial distress presents an immediate risk to 17students, employees, or public funds, the authorizer may 18initiate financial intervention.19    (c) The authorizer may exercise authority, limited to 20financial matters, over the charter school, including:21        (1) approval and oversight of expenditures and 22    disbursements;23        (2) oversight of payroll, benefits, and required 24    employee payments;25        (3) reviewing, modifying, or terminating any vendor 26    contracts necessary to ensure fiscal stability;  SB3391 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 20151 LNS 33602 b1        (4) protection, inventory, and preservation of public 2    assets; and3        (5) ensuring compliance with financial reporting and 4    audit requirements.5    (d) Financial intervention under this Section is temporary 6and may not exceed 180 days, except that the authorizer may 7extend the intervention once for good cause. The intervention 8shall terminate upon a determination by the authorizer that 9fiscal stability has been restored or upon charter revocation, 10surrender, nonrenewal, or closure.11    (e) Prior to initiating financial intervention, the 12authorizer shall provide written notice to the charter 13operator describing the basis for the intervention and provide 14an opportunity to respond, except in cases in which immediate 15action is required to protect students or public funds.16    (f) An authorizer's exercise of authority under this 17Section:18        (1) does not constitute operation or management of the 19    charter school;20        (2) does not create financial or legal liability for 21    the authorizer or its members; and22        (3) shall be deemed an oversight and regulatory 23    function for purposes of immunity under Section 27A-7.10.24    (g) Financial intervention under this Section does not 25preclude charter revocation, nonrenewal, or closure and may be 26used to stabilize operations pending an orderly closure   SB3391 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 20151 LNS 33602 b1pursuant to this Article, consistent with paragraph (2) of 2subsection (c) of Section 27A-9. 3    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 4severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.